lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX U Y 61
SFX U   ec          ce         ec
SFX U   ec          ci         ec
SFX U   ec          èe         ec
SFX U   ec          cem        ec
SFX U   ec          cù         ec
SFX U   ec          cùm        ec
SFX U   ec          cích       ec
SFX U   0           e          [^e]c
SFX U   0           i          [^e]c
SFX U   0           em         [^e]c
SFX U   0           ù          [^e]c
SFX U   0           ùm         [^e]c
SFX U   0           ích        [^e]c
SFX U   0           e          [^acïeò»]
SFX U   0           i          [^acïeò»i]
SFX U   0           ovi        [^acïeò»]
SFX U   0           em         [^acïeò»]
SFX U   0           ù          [^aceò]
SFX U   0           ùm         [^aceò]
SFX U   0           ích        [^acïeò»sx]
SFX U   0           ech        [sx]
SFX U   0           y          x
SFX U   a           e          a
SFX U   a           ovi        a
SFX U   a           em         a
SFX U   a           ové        a
SFX U   a           ù          a
SFX U   a           ùm         a
SFX U   a           i          a
SFX U   a           ích        a
SFX U   ï           dì         ï
SFX U   ï           di         ï
SFX U   ï           dìm        ï
SFX U   ï           dích       ï
SFX U   ò           nì         leò
SFX U   ò           ni         leò
SFX U   ò           nìm        leò
SFX U   0           ù          leò
SFX U   0           ùm         leò
SFX U   ò           ních       leò
SFX U   eò          nì         [^l]eò
SFX U   eò          ni         [^l]eò
SFX U   eò          nìm        [^l]eò
SFX U   eò          òù         [^l]eò
SFX U   eò          òùm        [^l]eò
SFX U   eò          ních       [^l]eò
SFX U   ò           nì         [^e]ò
SFX U   ò           ni         [^e]ò
SFX U   ò           nìm        [^e]ò
SFX U   0           ù          [^e]ò
SFX U   0           ùm         [^e]ò
SFX U   ò           ních       [^e]ò
SFX U   »           tì         »
SFX U   »           ti         »
SFX U   »           tìm        »
SFX U   »           tích       »
SFX U   e           i          e
SFX U   0           m          e
SFX U   e           ù          e
SFX U   e           ùm         e
SFX U   e           ích        e

SFX D Y 55
SFX D   es          a          es
SFX D   es          u          es
SFX D   es          ovi        es
SFX D   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX D   es          em         es
SFX D   es          ové        es
SFX D   es          ù          es
SFX D   es          ùm         es
SFX D   es          ech        [^ighk]es
SFX D   es          y          [^i]es
SFX D   es          ích        ies
SFX D   es          ách        kes
SFX D   es          i          ies
SFX D   os          a          os
SFX D   os          u          os
SFX D   os          ovi        os
SFX D   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX D   os          em         os
SFX D   os          ové        os
SFX D   os          ù          os
SFX D   os          ùm         os
SFX D   os          ech        [^ighk]os
SFX D   os          y          [^i]os
SFX D   os          ích        ios
SFX D   os          ách        kos
SFX D   os          i          ios
SFX D   us          a          us
SFX D   us          u          us
SFX D   us          ovi        us
SFX D   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX D   us          em         us
SFX D   us          ové        us
SFX D   us          ù          us
SFX D   us          ùm         us
SFX D   us          ech        [^eik]us
SFX D   us          y          [^ei]us
SFX D   us          ích        [ei]us
SFX D   us          ách        kus
SFX D   us          i          [ei]us
SFX D   0           é          [^eou]s
SFX D   0           é          [^asy]
SFX D   a           é          a
SFX D   ky          ek         [èdntv]ky
SFX D   y           ù          [^èdntv]ky
SFX D   ny          n          any
SFX D   y           ù          [^kn]y
SFX D   y           ám         [èdntv]ky
SFX D   y           ùm         [^èdntv]ky
SFX D   y           ùm         [^k]y
SFX D   y           ách        [gh]y
SFX D   y           ách        [èdntv]ky
SFX D   ky          cích       [^èdntv]ky
SFX D   y           ech        [^ghk]y
SFX D   y           ích        [sz]y
SFX D   y           ami        [èdntv]ky

SFX H Y 24
SFX H   0           u          [^ey]
SFX H   0           e          [^eyghkc]
SFX H   0           em         [^ey]
SFX H   0           y          [^ey]
SFX H   0           ù          [^ey]
SFX H   0           ùm         [^ey]
SFX H   0           ech        [^eyghk]
SFX H   g           zích       g
SFX H   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX H   ch          ¹ích       ch
SFX H   k           cích       k
SFX H   e           u          e
SFX H   0           m          e
SFX H   e           y          e
SFX H   e           ù          e
SFX H   e           ùm         e
SFX H   e           ech        e
SFX H   y           ù          y
SFX H   y           ùm         y
SFX H   y           ech        [^ghk]y
SFX H   gy          zích       gy
SFX H   hy          zích       [^c]hy
SFX H   chy         ¹ích       chy
SFX H   ky          cích       ky

SFX L Y 55
SFX L   0           a          [^nk]
SFX L   0           u          [^nk]
SFX L   0           e          [^kn]
SFX L   k           ce         yk
SFX L   0           ì          [bdfmptvw]
SFX L   0           em         [^nk]
SFX L   0           y          [^nk]
SFX L   0           ù          [^nk]
SFX L   0           ùm         [^nk]
SFX L   0           ech        [bdflmprtvz]
SFX L   0           ách        [gh]
SFX L   g           zích       g
SFX L   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX L   ch          ¹ích       ch
SFX L   0           ích        [cèjøs¹¾]
SFX L   ek          ka         ek
SFX L   ek          ku         ek
SFX L   ek          kem        ek
SFX L   ek          ky         ek
SFX L   ek          kù         ek
SFX L   ek          kùm        ek
SFX L   ek          cích       ek
SFX L   ek          kách       íèek
SFX L   0           a          [^e]k
SFX L   0           u          [^e]k
SFX L   0           em         [^e]k
SFX L   0           y          [^e]k
SFX L   0           ù          [^e]k
SFX L   0           ùm         [^e]k
SFX L   k           cích       [^e]k
SFX L   0           a          men
SFX L   0           u          men
SFX L   0           e          men
SFX L   0           em         men
SFX L   0           y          men
SFX L   0           ù          men
SFX L   0           ùm         men
SFX L   0           ech        men
SFX L   en          na         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nu         [^m]en
SFX L   en          ne         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nem        [^m]en
SFX L   en          ny         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nù         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nùm        [^m]en
SFX L   en          nech       [^m]en
SFX L   0           a          [^e]n
SFX L   0           u          [^e]n
SFX L   0           e          [^e]n
SFX L   0           ì          [áéíý]n
SFX L   0           em         [^e]n
SFX L   0           y          [^e]n
SFX L   0           ù          [^e]n
SFX L   0           ùm         [^e]n
SFX L   0           ech        [^e]n
