lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
afrikanista/PD
aft/H
akupunkturista/PD
alergen/H
altsaxofonista/PD
analyzátor/H
anarchokomunista/PDI
Andrej/UV
Angolan/PDI
antihumanista/PD
antisocialista/PD
aperitiv/H
Aristoteles/D
Artuą/UV
assembler/H
atomista/PD
automobilista/PD
autopotah/H
Bačkov/L
badmintonista/PD
bachař/U
baloňák/H
bandoneonista/PD
Barchov/L
Baroą/UV
barytonsaxofonista/PD
Bečvář/UV
Bedřichov/L
běhoun/H
beletrista/PD
Berlín/L
Bezměrov/L
bezobratlovec/U
biblista/PD
bigbeat/H
Bivoj/UV
Blahoňov/L
blankvers/H
Bohdalov/L
Bojanov/L
Bolivijec/U
Borovany/D
Boskovątejn/L
bourák/H
Boľejov/L
Brahms/UV
Braąkov/L
Brumov/L
bruslař/U
budhista/PD
Budíkov/L
Buchenwald/H
Buřič/UV
Buąín/L
castrista/PD
centík/H
Cihlář/UV
citerista/PD
Cizkrajov/L
coulomb/H
cvičenec/U
Čaďan/PD
Částkov/L
Čerchov/L
Červeň/UV
Čeąov/L
čibuk/H
čtvrtek/L
čtyřnoľec/U
dadaista/PD
Debrecín/HL
deista/PD
Děkov/L
dervią/UV
deątník/H
determinista/PD
díl/H
Dobrochov/L
dodavatel/UD
dohazovač/U
dolet/H
Domanín/L
donaąeč/U
doručovatel/UD
Drahlín/L
Drahoň/UV
Dráľov/L
dres/H
dřevorytec/U
duatlonista/PD
Duchcov/L
dvacetník/H
Efesan/PDI
ejakulátor/H
ekoturista/PD
Eliáą/UV
enzym/H
esejista/PD
etylendibromid/H
europesimista/PD
existencialista/PD
exsocialista/PD
faląovatel/UD
Faltys/UV
fazol/H
fejetonista/PD
Filipan/PDI
Filipínec/U
flek/H
fórista/PD
fotel/H
franątinář/U
Frantiąkov/L
fundamentalista/PD
gamaglobulin/H
gaullista/PD
Georgijec/U
glyceryltriacetát/H
golfista/PD
Grymov/L
Guinejec/U
gyroskop/H
Hai»an/PDI
handlíř/U
Hazlov/L
Hebrejec/U
hendikep/H
Hermes/D
hlasista/PD
hledač/U
Hlučín/L
hodokvas/H
Hodonín/L
hofrychtář/U
Holątejn/L
homunkulus/D
Hořeją/UV
Hostějov/L
Hradeąín/L
hrkač/U
Hruąovany/D
hřebčín/L
hřebíčkovec/U
hukot/H
chaos/H
Charles/UV
chartista/PD
chlebíček/QL
Chomutov/L
chór/H
chovatel/UD
Chrľín/L
idealista/PD
indoevropeista/PD
induktor/H
internacionalista/PD
iron/H
Islanďan/PD
Izaiáą/UV
Jahodov/L
Jareą/UV
ječmen/LSR
jehovista/PD
Jemen/H
Jenkins/UV
Jeruzalém/L
Jinoąov/L
Johanis/UV
judista/PD
Kácov/L
kajetán/H
kalich/L
Kalią/UV
Kanaďan/PD
karafiát/H
kariérista/PD
Kaąąovic/UV
katalyzátor/H
kazatel/UD
Kaznějov/L
Kingstown/H
kleątěnec/U
Klíčov/L
klubista/PD
knedlík/H
Kočov/L
kódovač/U
Koląov/L
Kolumbus/D
komparátor/H
kompletář/U
komponista/PD
konjunkturalista/PD
konstituent/H
konzervatorista/PD
Koreň/UV
Koryčany/D
kořenovník/H
kostelík/L
kout/L
Kovář/UV
Kozomín/L
kramář/U
Kratuąín/L
Kré»an/PD
krompáč/U
Krompach/H
Krumlov/L
Křesín/L
Křivoą/UV
Křtěnov/L
kubista/PD
kumątýř/UV
kurt/H
Kuľelov/L
kvartetista/PD
kyslík/H
Kytín/L
Labaj/UV
Lazinov/L
léčitel/UD
legislativec/U
lept/H
letoąek/L
levita/PD
Libanonec/U
Libotov/L
Lipov/L
Líą»any/D
logogram/H
Lochov/L
lokaj/UV
lupič/U
Lutotín/L
Makalouą/UV
makaron/H
makista/PD
makrosvět/L
Málkov/L
maratonec/U
martenzit/H
Matěj/UV
maximalista/PD
Mazelov/L
menhir/H
Merklín/L
měřič/US
mezolit/H
Mikolaj/UV
Mikulov/L
Milíčov/L
minervista/PD
minilab/H
Mířkov/L
místodrľitel/UD
Modlíkov/L
monogram/H
monoteista/PD
Moravec/UV
Mratín/L
mučitel/UD
multiservis/H
muľ/UV
Nadějov/L
nadrľenec/U
nákyp/H
naplňovatel/UD
narcista/PD
Naurujec/U
Neandertal/H
Nečín/L
nelezec/U
neonacista/PD
Neředín/L
neurvalec/U
nitrid/H
Níľkov/L
Nostradamus/D
novic/UV
oběd/L
objednatel/UD
objednávatel/UD
obkročák/HL
obsluhovač/U
odlesk/H
odposlouchávač/U
oktadekahydrát/H
okultista/PD
Olbramov/L
opeřenec/U
Oráčov/L
ornát/HR
Ostravan/PD
otrhanec/UV
ovsíček/L
oxysulfid/H
Pankrác/UV
panslavista/PD
paragliding/H
patriciát/H
perkusista/PDI
perle»ovec/U
perm/H
Pernątejn/L
Pivrnec/UV
plakát/HR
Plutarchos/D
Pňov/L
podbiják/H
podkovář/U
podval/H
pólista/PD
polooblouk/H
polyvinyl/H
pomatenec/U
Postřiľín/L
postupitel/UD
posun/H
Poąvář/U
prakticista/PD
prdelolezec/U
predikát/HR
pronárod/L
propylparahydroxybenzoát/H
protekcionista/PD
provinilec/U
prták/H
prýt/H
překladatel/UD
přeslech/H
Přestanov/L
přístup/H
příznivec/U
purista/PD
půst/H
Račín/L
raketomet/H
Rapotín/L
Ratvaj/UV
redemptorista/PD
relaps/H
rock/H
rokovatel/UD
Rostov/L
rozervanec/U
rozlet/H
Ryč/UV
rychlík/H
Rychnov/L
řiditel/UD
samohyb/H
samotář/U
Savín/L
sběratel/UD
semestr/H
Servác/UV
severomoravan/PDI
schilling/H
sjednotitel/UD
skorbut/H
Skrýchov/L
slídič/U
Smrľov/L
snop/H
socialista/PD
spáč/U
spár/H
spiritista/PD
spoluzakladatel/UD
správce/UV
stator/H
Stochov/L
strojvůdce/U
strom/HR
Stropeąín/L
střadatel/UD
sulfochlorid/H
světlonoą/U
Světnov/L
svod/HR
ąachista/PD
©achov/L
ąifón/H
ąimpanz/U
©luknov/L
©»áhlavy/HQ
ątvanec/U
©vihov/L
Tallinn/H
talmudista/PD
teorém/H
Terč/UV
těąitel/UD
Tetín/L
tis/H
transvestita/PD
trip/H
trojúhelník/HL
troudnatec/U
Tvrdkov/L
tympanista/PD
udavatel/UD
úklad/H
ultranacionalista/PD
únor/L
Urbanovič/UV
utlačovatel/UD
Varaľdín/L
Váąa/UV
vazník/H
Velichov/L
verista/PD
věznitel/UD
Vincencov/L
vkus/HN
vodohospodář/U
Vojtanov/L
volejbalista/PD
vąevládce/U
vymahač/U
výmět/H
Výrov/L
Vysočany/D
vyvrľenec/U
York/H
Zambijec/U
západoevropan/PD
Zavlekov/L
zbabělec/U
Zlonín/L
zmocněnec/U
zmocnitel/UD
zob/H
ľadatel/UD
ľivitel/UD
®umberk/L
